Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20264-202
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act is to provide public transparency for the political and propaganda activities and influence operations of agents of adversary nations and foreign terror organizations in Nebraska.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 2.